Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.691

Municipalities—Energy audits and efficiency.

(1) Municipalities may conduct energy audits and implement cost-effective energy conservation measures among multiple government entities.

(2) All municipalities shall report to the department if they implemented or did not implement, during the previous biennium, cost-effective energy conservation measures aggregated among multiple government entities. The reports must be submitted to the department by September 1, 2007, and by September 1, 2009. In collecting the reports, the department shall cooperate with the appropriate associations that represent municipalities.

(3) The department shall prepare a report summarizing the reports submitted by municipalities under subsection (2) of this section and shall report to the committee by December 31, 2007, and by December 31, 2009.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Committee" means the joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation in chapter 44.39 RCW.

(b) "Cost-effective energy conservation measures" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.19.670.

(c) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.

(d) "Energy audit" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.19.670.

(e) "Municipality" has the meaning provided in RCW 39.04.010.

[ 2015 c 225 s 69; 2005 c 299 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 299: See note following RCW 44.39.010.